Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-307 Lien of carrier. (a) A
carrier has a lien on the goods covered by a bill of lading or on the proceeds
thereof in its possession for charges after the date of the carrier's receipt
of the goods for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal
charges, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods incident to
their transportation or reasonably incurred in their sale pursuant to law.
However, against a purchaser for value of a negotiable bill of lading, a
carrier's lien is limited to charges stated in the bill or the applicable
tariffs or, if no charges are stated, a reasonable charge.

(b) A lien for charges and expenses under
subsection (a) on goods that the carrier was required by law to receive for
transportation is effective against the consignor or any person entitled to the
goods unless the carrier had notice that the consignor lacked authority to
subject the goods to those charges and expenses. Any other lien under
subsection (a) is effective against the consignor and any person that permitted
the bailor to have control or possession of the goods unless the carrier had
notice that the bailor lacked authority.

(c) A carrier loses its lien on any goods that
it voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver. [L 2004, c 163, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next